Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. Interference with Streams and Waters.

Sec. 16.10.010.
Interference with salmon spawning streams and waters.

A person may not, without first applying for and obtaining a permit or license from the Department of Environmental Conservation,

obstruct, divert, or pollute waters of the state, either fresh or salt, utilized by salmon in the propagation of the species, by felling trees or timber in those waters, casting, passing, throwing, or dumping tree limbs or foliage, underbrush, stumps, rubbish, earth, stones, rock, or other debris, or passing or dumping sawdust, planer shavings, or other waste or refuse of any kind in those waters;

erect a dam, barricade, or obstruction to retard, conserve, impound, or divert the waters described in (1) of this subsection to prevent, retard, or interfere with the free ingress or egress of salmon into those waters in the natural spawning or propagation process;

render the waters described in (1) of this subsection inaccessible or uninhabitable for salmon for spawning or propagation.

The application for the permit or license referred to in (a) of this section must set out the name and style of the person or concern, describe the waters and location, and state in particular the plans, purpose, and intention for which the application is made.

History.

(§ 39-2-31 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 117 SLA 1949; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 12 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 28 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

See also AS

16.05.841

—

16.05.901

.

Legislative history reports. —

For the purpose of the amendments made to this section by § 28, ch. 30, SLA 1996 (CSSB 310 (STA)), see 1996 Senate Journal Supp. No. 15 (June 27, 1996).

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no conflict between former AS

16.05.870

[now AS

16.05.871

] and this section.
March 4, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game and Wildlife Conservation, § 28 et seq.

36A C.J.S., Fish, §§ 6 — 13, 36.

Sec. 16.10.020.
Grounds for permit or license.

If in the judgment of the Department of Environmental Conservation, the purpose of the applicant for the permit or license is to develop power, obtain water for civic, domestic, irrigation, manufacturing, mining, or other purposes tending to develop the natural resources of the state, the department may grant the permit or license and may require the applicant to construct and maintain adequate fish ladders, fishways, or other means by which fish may pass over, around, or through the dam, obstruction or diversion in the pursuit of the propagation or spawning process.

History.

(§ 39-2-32 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 117 SLA 1949; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 5 ch 21 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

See also AS

16.05.841

—

16.05.901

.

Sec. 16.10.030.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.10.010 — 16.10.050.

A person who violates AS

16.10.010

—

16.10.050

is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $500.

History.

(§ 39-2-33 ACLA 1949; am § 13 ch 208 SLA 1975; am § 19 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Sec. 16.10.040.
Disposition of money received for fines and penalties.

The proceeds of all fines and penalties imposed under AS

16.10.010

—

16.10.050

shall be paid into the general fund and they shall be immediately available for expenditure by the Department of Fish and Game.

History.

(§ 39-2-34 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 16.10.050.
Construction of AS 16.10.010 — 16.10.050.

AS

16.10.010

—

16.10.050

do not affect the vested rights or privileges granted by federal statute to any person.

History.

(§ 39-2-35 ACLA 1949)